Tennessee, session 114, SB1456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 68 of the Private Acts of 1937, as amended by Chapter 63 of the
Private Acts of 2003, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended in Section (3)(a) by
deleting the language "eighty-five percent (85%)" and substituting the language "ninety-two
percent (92%)".
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Hardeman County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state, as prescribed
in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 3, Part 2.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
SB1456
002278
- 1 -